Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4007
Sentencing court; duties; Department of Correctional Services or local facility; Department of Motor Vehicles; notification requirements; Attorney General; approve form.

(1) When sentencing a person convicted of a registrable offense under section 29-4003, the court shall:

(a) Provide written notification of the duty to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act at the time of sentencing to any defendant who has pled guilty or has been found guilty of a registrable offense under section 29-4003. The written notification shall:

(i) Inform the defendant of whether or not he or she is subject to the act, the duration of time he or she will be subject to the act, and that he or she shall report to a location designated by the Nebraska State Patrol for purposes of accepting such registration within three working days after the date of the written notification to register;

(ii) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another address within the same county, he or she must report to the county sheriff of the county in which he or she is residing within three working days before his or her move;

(iii) Inform the defendant that if he or she no longer has a residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location, he or she shall report such change in person to the sheriff of the county in which he or she is located within three working days after such change in residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location;

(iv) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another county in the State of Nebraska, he or she must notify, in person, the county sheriff of the county in which he or she had been last residing, had a temporary domicile, or had a habitual living location and the county sheriff of the county in which he or she is residing, has a temporary domicile, or is habitually living of his or her current address. The notice must be given within three working days before his or her move;

(v) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another state, he or she must report, in person, the change of address to the county sheriff of the county in which he or she has been residing, has had a temporary domicile, or has had a habitual living location and must comply with the registration requirements of the state to which he or she is moving. The notice must be given within three working days before his or her move;

(vi) Inform the defendant that he or she shall (A) inform the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides, has a temporary domicile, or is habitually living, in person, of each educational institution at which he or she is employed, carries on a vocation, or attends school, within three working days after such employment or attendance, and (B) notify the sheriff of any change in such employment or attendance status of such person at such educational institution, within three working days;

(vii) Inform the defendant that he or she shall (A) inform the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person, of the name and address of any place where he or she is or will be an employee, within three working days after such employment, and (B) inform the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person, of any change in his or her employment;

(viii) Inform the defendant that if he or she goes to another state to work or goes to another state as a student and still resides, has a temporary domicile, or has a habitual living location in this state, he or she must comply with the registration requirements of both states;

(ix) Inform the defendant that fingerprints, palm prints, a DNA sample if not previously collected, and a photograph will be obtained by any registering entity in order to comply with the registration requirements;

(x) Inform the defendant of registry and verification locations; and

(xi) Inform the defendant of the reduction request requirements, if eligible, under section 29-4005;

(b) Require the defendant to read and sign the registration form stating that the duty of the defendant to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act has been explained;

(c) Retain the original notification signed by the defendant; and

(d) Provide a copy of the filed notification, the information or amended information, and the sentencing order of the court to the county attorney, the defendant, the sex offender registration and community notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol, and the county sheriff of the county in which the defendant resides, has a temporary domicile, or has a habitual living location.

(2) When a person is convicted of a registrable offense under section 29-4003 and is not subject to immediate incarceration upon sentencing, prior to being released by the court, the sentencing court shall ensure that the defendant is registered by a Nebraska State Patrol office or other location designated by the patrol for purposes of accepting registrations.

(3)(a) The Department of Correctional Services or a city or county correctional or jail facility shall provide written notification of the duty to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act to any person committed to its custody for a registrable offense under section 29-4003 prior to the person's release from incarceration. The written notification shall:

(i) Inform the person of whether or not he or she is subject to the act, the duration of time he or she will be subject to the act, and that he or she shall report to a location designated by the Nebraska State Patrol for purposes of accepting such registration within three working days after the date of the written notification to register;

(ii) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another address within the same county, he or she must report all address changes, in person, to the county sheriff of the county in which he or she has been residing within three working days before his or her move;

(iii) Inform the defendant that if he or she no longer has a residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location, he or she shall report such change in person to the sheriff of the county in which he or she is located within three working days after such change in residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location;

(iv) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another county in the State of Nebraska, he or she must notify, in person, the county sheriff of the county in which he or she had been last residing, had a temporary domicile, or had a habitual living location and the county sheriff of the county in which he or she is residing, has a temporary domicile, or is habitually living of his or her current address. The notice must be given within three working days before his or her move;

(v) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another state, he or she must report, in person, the change of address to the county sheriff of the county in which he or she has been residing, has had a temporary domicile, or has been habitually living and must comply with the registration requirements of the state to which he or she is moving. The report must be given within three working days before his or her move;

(vi) Inform the person that he or she shall (A) inform the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides, has a temporary domicile, or is habitually living, in person, of each educational institution at which he or she is employed, carries on a vocation, or attends school, within three working days after such employment or attendance, and (B) notify the sheriff of any change in such employment or attendance status of such person at such educational institution, within three working days after such change;

(vii) Inform the person that he or she shall (A) inform the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person, of the name and address of any place where he or she is or will be an employee, within three working days after such employment, and (B) inform the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person, of any change in his or her employment;

(viii) Inform the person that if he or she goes to another state to work or goes to another state as a student and still resides, has a temporary domicile, or has a habitual living location in this state, he or she must comply with the registration requirements of both states;

(ix) Inform the defendant that fingerprints, palm prints, a DNA sample if not previously collected, and a photograph will be obtained by any registering entity in order to comply with the registration requirements;

(x) Inform the defendant of registry and verification locations; and

(xi) Inform the defendant of the reduction request requirements, if eligible, under section 29-4005.

(b) The Department of Correctional Services or a city or county correctional or jail facility shall:

(i) Require the person to read and sign the notification form stating that the duty to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act has been explained;

(ii) Retain a signed copy of the written notification to register; and

(iii) Provide a copy of the signed, written notification to register to the person and to the sex offender registration and community notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol.

(4) If a person is convicted of a registrable offense under section 29-4003 and is immediately incarcerated, he or she shall be registered as required under the act prior to discharge, parole, or work release.

(5) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cause written notification of the duty to register to be provided on the applications for a motor vehicle operator's license and for a commercial driver's license.

(6) All written notification as provided in this section shall be on a form approved by the Attorney General.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 204, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 564, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 27;

Laws 2009, LB285, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB292, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 63.

Following the 2009 amendments to the Sex Offender Registration Act, a sentencing court has the authority to
find that a defendant committed an aggravated offense as defined in section 29-4001.01 and to inform the defendant
that he or she is thus required to register for life under section 29-4005. State v. Wilson, 306 Neb. 875, 947 N.W.2d
704 (2020).